Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-464
Itemized billing statement; duty to provide.

A health care facility or a health care practitioner facility, upon written request of a patient or a patient's representative, shall provide an itemized billing statement, including diagnostic codes, without charge to the patient or patient's representative. Such itemized billing statement shall be provided within fourteen days after the request.

Laws 2009, LB288, § 32.